Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1

Judicial Appointment

17-4-101. Appointment by governor — Length of term — Vacancy — Confirmation.

The governor shall appoint a qualified person to the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals:

For a full eight-year term whenever an incumbent judge of the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals fails to file with the state election commission a written declaration of candidacy or withdraws a declaration of candidacy within the deadlines established by § 17-4-106 or is not retained in a retention election held at the end of an eight-year term; or

To fill a vacancy occurring as a result of death, resignation, retirement, failure to be retained at a retention election held any time other than the end of an eight-year term, or otherwise.

The governor's appointee shall not take office until the appointee has been confirmed by the general assembly by vote or by default as provided in this part.

Upon notice of an impending vacancy, the process of appointment and confirmation in accordance with this part may proceed; however, a confirmed appointee shall not take office until the vacancy actually occurs.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “It is the declared purpose and intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to:“(1) Assist the governor in finding and appointing the best qualified persons available for service on the appellate courts of this state, and to assist the electorate of this state in electing the best qualified persons to the courts;“(2) Better insulate the judges of the courts from political influence and pressure;“(3) Improve the administration of justice;“(4) Enhance the prestige of and respect for the courts by minimizing the necessity of political activities by appellate judges; and“(5) Make the courts less political.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 5.

Law Reviews.

A Response to Professor Fitzpatrick: The Rest of the Story (Penny J. White & Malia Reddick), 75 Tenn. L. Rev. 501 (2008).

Errors, Omissions, and the Tennessee Plan (Brian T. Fitzpatrick), 39 U. Mem. L. Rev. 85 (2008).

Ethical Obligations of Judges (Joe G. Riley), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 507 (1993).

Modified “Missouri Plan” Passes in Legislature, 30 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 6 (1994).

Attorney General Opinions. Residency requirements for the appellate courts, OAG 94-141 (11/28/94).

Comparative Legislation. Nominating commissions:

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 34.010 et seq.

Mo. S. Ct. R. 10.01 et seq.

17-4-102. Written notice of judicial appointment by governor — Background investigations of appointees — Confirmation or rejection by general assembly.

Immediately upon making an appointment to the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals, the governor shall provide written notice of the appointment to the chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. The notice shall specify whether the appointment is for a full eight-year term or for the filling of a vacancy. Delivery of the notice of appointment to both the chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall begin the appropriate sixty-day period established in accordance with § 17-4-103. Upon receiving the notice of appointment, the chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall notify the members of their respective house and shall refer the notice of appointment to the appropriate standing committee of their respective house as provided by rule.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall perform appropriate financial and criminal background investigations of a judicial appointee and shall provide the results of the investigations and inquiries to the chair of any standing committee of the general assembly to which a notice of appointment pursuant to subsection (a) is referred.

The chair of any standing committee of the general assembly to which a notice of appointment pursuant to subsection (a) is referred may, in accordance with the rules of the applicable house, conduct a hearing, vote to recommend confirmation or rejection of the appointee, and submit a written report of the action taken to the applicable clerk.

Within the appropriate sixty-day period established in accordance with § 17-4-103, the general assembly shall meet in joint session for the purpose of voting either to confirm or to reject the governor's appointee. The votes of each house shall be made and tabulated separately. The governor's appointee shall be confirmed if both houses vote to confirm the appointee by a majority of all the members to which each house is entitled. The governor's appointee shall be rejected if both houses vote to reject the appointee by a majority of all the members to which each house is entitled or if one (1) house votes to reject the appointee by at least two-thirds (2/3) of all members to which the house is entitled. If a vote results in any other outcome, then no action is taken and both houses may vote again to confirm or reject, subject to § 17-4-103(b). No vote shall be taken pursuant to this subsection (d) except in joint session.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. The judicial nominating commission, created by this section, terminated June 30, 2012, and entered its wind-up period pursuant to the provisions of §4-29-112. Wind-up was completed on June 30, 2013. See §§4-29-104,4-29-112.

Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) There is established as a part of the judicial branch of the state a judicial nominating commission, to be composed of seventeen (17) members as follows:“(1) Eight (8) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate;“(A) Two (2) of the members shall be appointed from each of the state's three (3) grand divisions, and the remaining two (2) members shall be appointed at-large; and“(B) At least five (5) of the members shall be attorneys;“(2) Eight (8) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;“(A) Two (2) of the members shall be appointed from each of the state's three (3) grand divisions, and the remaining two (2) members shall be appointed at-large; and“(B) At least five (5) of the members shall be attorneys;“(3) One (1) non-attorney member shall be appointed at-large by joint action of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and“(4) Not more than three (3) of the members appointed at-large may be residents of the same grand division.“(b)(1) The entire membership of the judicial selection commission shall be vacated and shall be replaced by new appointments made to the judicial nominating commission pursuant to this section. In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed commission members, initial appointments shall be made as follows:“(A) Two (2) of the speaker of the senates's initial appointments shall be made for terms of two (2) years each;“(B) Two (2) of the speaker of the house's initial appointments shall be made for terms of two (2) years each;“(C) The speakers' joint appointment shall be made for a term of two (2) years;“(D) Three (3) of the speaker of the senate's initial appointments shall be made for terms of four (4) years each;“(E) Three (3) of the speaker of the house's initial appointments shall be made for terms of four (4) years each;“(F) Three (3) of the speaker of the senate's initial appointments shall be made for terms of six (6) years each; and“(G) Three (3) of the speaker of the house's initial appointments shall be made for terms of six (6) years each.“(2) Thereafter, the terms for all appointments shall comply with §§17-4-106 and17-4-107(a).“(c) In making the appointments to the judicial nominating commission, each speaker shall do so with a conscious intention of selecting a body that reflects diversity with respect to:“(1) Race, including the dominant ethnic minority population;“(2) Gender; and“(3) Representation of rural areas as well as urban centers.“(d) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and post on its web site a downloadable information and application form for citizens who wish to be considered for appointment to the judicial nominating commission. The form shall indicate all qualifications required for appointment to the commission. To be considered for appointment, each applicant must complete, sign and submit the form. Appropriate deadlines for submission of the forms shall be established by the administrative office of the courts in advance of each scheduled vacancy and promptly after the occurrence of any unscheduled vacancy. Each time that deadlines are so established, in addition to notice posted on its web site, the administrative office of the courts shall take appropriate action to notify the general public and shall provide written notification to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. Immediately following the occurrence of any such deadline, the administrative office of the courts shall post on its web site a summary report of all qualified applicants for the vacant position or positions. The summary report shall include at least the name, county of residence and occupation of each applicant. For a period of fourteen (14) days following the posting of the summary report, the administrative office of the courts shall receive public comments from interested persons and organizations. At the conclusion of the period for public comments, the application forms and corresponding public comments shall be forwarded to the appropriate speaker or speakers for consideration and action. Within fourteen (14) days following receipt of the information, the speaker or speakers shall make the required appointments from the pool of qualified applicants. However, for good cause, either speaker may fill a vacancy by appointing a qualified person not included within the pool of applicants if the speaker provides written notice to the administrative office of the courts stating the reasons for appointing a person not included within the pool of applicants.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand division, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Errors, Omissions, and the Tennessee Plan (Brian T. Fitzpatrick), 39 U. Mem. L. Rev. 85 (2008).

17-4-103. Legislative vote on confirmation.

If the general assembly is in its annual legislative session when the appointment is made, then the vote, if any, on confirmation of the governor's appointee shall occur within sixty (60) consecutive calendar days immediately following the appointment.

If the general assembly is not in its annual legislative session when the appointment is made, then the vote, if any, on confirmation of the governor's appointee shall occur within sixty (60) consecutive calendar days, beginning on the convening date of the next annual legislative session following the appointment.

If the general assembly fails to reject the governor's appointee within sixty (60) consecutive calendar days, then the appointee shall be deemed confirmed as of the following calendar day, regardless of whether the general assembly is then in session.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Each member of the judicial nominating commission shall be a citizen of the United States, shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, and shall have been a citizen of this state for at least five (5) years immediately prior to appointment. Any member appointed from one (1) of the state's grand divisions shall have been a resident of that grand division for at least one (1) year immediately prior to appointment.“(b) Each attorney member shall be duly licensed to practice by the Tennessee supreme court.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Grand division, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

17-4-104. Commencement of service.

A supreme court, court of appeals, or court of criminal appeals judge confirmed in accordance with this part shall commence service in the office to which the judge was confirmed:

Upon confirmation, if the judge is confirmed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term;

September 1, if the judge is confirmed to a full eight-year term prior to the September 1 on which the term begins; or

Upon confirmation, if the judge is confirmed to a full eight-year term after the eight-year term has commenced on September 1. The eight-year term of a supreme court, court of appeals, or court of criminal appeals judge confirmed after September 1 shall end on the same date as a judge confirmed on or prior to September 1.

If the governor's appointee is rejected by the general assembly or is withdrawn by the governor within sixty (60) calendar days of the applicable date set out in § 17-4-103(a), then the governor shall appoint another individual for a full term or to fill a vacancy as provided in this part. Any appointee who has been rejected by the general assembly is not eligible for reappointment to the same court, until after the next regular August election occurring at least one (1) year following the appointment.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2012, ch. 853, § 2; 2016, ch. 528, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment added the second sentence to (a).

The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) No member of the judicial nominating commission shall be a salaried office holder of this state or the United States, nor shall any member of the commission hold any office in any political party or political organization; provided, that members of the national guard and members of any armed forces reserve organization, any district attorney general or an employee of a district attorney general or any district public defender or an employee of a district public defender shall not be considered as salaried office holders. This subsection (a) shall not apply to the solicitor general or any employee of the attorney general and reporter, any of whom shall be eligible to serve as a member of the judicial nominating commission.“(b) Any member of the judicial nominating commission who becomes a salaried office holder of this state or the United States or who accepts any office in any political party or political organization ipso facto vacates the member's office as a member of the commission.“(c) No member of the judicial nominating commission shall be a registered employer of a lobbyist in this state or a registered lobbyist in this state. Any member of the commission who becomes a registered employer of a lobbyist or a registered lobbyist in this state ipso facto vacates the member's office as a member of the commission.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2012, ch. 853, § 5. April 27, 2012.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. Service as University of Tennessee assistant general counsel and member of judicial selection commission, OAG 00-054 (3/23/00).

17-4-105. Retention elections.

A judge, who has been appointed and confirmed for a full eight-year term on the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals and who takes office on September 1 at the beginning of the eight-year term or in accordance with § 17-4-104(a)(3), shall face a retention election at the next regular August election immediately preceding the end of the eight-year term, as provided in § 17-4-106.

A judge, who has been appointed and confirmed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term on the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals more than thirty (30) days prior to the next regular August election, shall stand for election in a retention election for the remainder of the term at the next regular August election following confirmation as provided in § 17-4-106.

A judge, who has been appointed and confirmed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term on the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals thirty (30) days or less prior to a regular August election, shall stand for election in a retention election at the next regular August election occurring more than thirty (30) days following the judge's confirmation as provided in § 17-4-106.

All incumbent judges of the supreme court, the court of appeals, and the court of criminal appeals who intend to stand for election for another eight-year term, shall stand for election in a retention election at the regular August election immediately preceding the end of the eight-year term as provided in § 17-4-106.

The judges appointed in 2014, 2015, and prior to January 28, 2016, to fill vacancies on the supreme court, the court of appeals, and the court of criminal appeals, whose names were not included on the regular August 2014 ballot, shall, upon filing a timely written declaration of candidacy pursuant to § 17-4-106 not later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on April 7, 2016, stand for election in a retention election in the regular August election in 2016.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) The term of office of each member of the judicial nominating commission shall begin on July 1, 2009.“(b)(1) As soon as practicable after July 1, 2009, the judicial nominating commission shall meet in an organizational session convened by the chief justice of the supreme court.“(2) At the first organizational meeting, the chief justice shall preside as temporary chair, and a permanent chair shall be elected from the membership of the commission.“(3) If the chief justice is unable to convene the commission or serve as temporary chair, the chief justice may designate another member of the supreme court to so serve.“(c) The commission may elect such other officers as it deems necessary and proper, and may adopt and from time to time amend bylaws and rules of procedure for the conduct of its business and discharge of its duties.“(d) The commission may employ such secretarial and clerical assistance as it deems necessary.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-106. Written declaration of candidacy required.

An incumbent judge of the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals who seeks to be retained in the office to which the incumbent judge was appointed and confirmed must qualify by filing with the state election commission a written declaration of candidacy to be retained for a full term or an unexpired term. The declaration must be filed not later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the first Thursday in January before the regular August election. A judge confirmed after the first Thursday in January in the same year as the regular August election must file the declaration no later than the first Thursday occurring at least one (1) full week after the judge's confirmation. After timely filing the declaration, a candidate may withdraw by filing a notice of withdrawal with the state election commission not later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the seventh day after the deadline for filing the declaration of candidacy.

If the declaration of candidacy is timely filed, then only the name of the candidate, without party designation, shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the state in the regular August election. Each county election commission of the state shall cause the following to be placed on the ballot:

Shall (Name of Candidate) be retained in office as a Judge of the (Name of Court) or be replaced?

Retain

OR

Replace

If the declaration of candidacy is not timely filed, then the judge's name shall not be submitted to the qualified voters of the state.

If a majority of those voting on the question vote to retain the candidate, then the candidate is duly elected to the office and shall be given a certificate of election.

If a majority or one-half (½) of those voting on the question vote not to retain the candidate, then a vacancy exists in the office as of September 1 following the regular August election. The governor shall fill the vacancy subject to confirmation by the general assembly in accordance with this part.

A candidate who has been defeated in any retention election held under this chapter shall not be eligible for reappointment to the seat for which the candidate was defeated until one (1) regular August election has occurred subsequent to the defeat.

An incumbent judge on the supreme court, the court of appeals, or the court of criminal appeals who does not file a declaration of candidacy for election within the prescribed time, who withdraws as a candidate for election, or who is not retained in a retention election, shall end the judge's term on August 31 of that year. The governor shall fill the office subject to confirmation by the general assembly in accordance with this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2012, ch. 853, § 1; 2016, ch. 528, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “No member shall be eligible for reappointment for a successive term, unless the member’s previous appointment was for an initial or partial term of twenty-four (24) months or less.”

The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in §17-4-102(b) or §17-4-107(a), the term of a member of the judicial nominating commission shall be six (6) years.“(b) Members shall be eligible for reappointment for a successive term.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 6. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2012, ch. 853, § 5. April 27, 2012.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-107 concerned vacancies on commission.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-108 concerned service of members without compensation and expenses.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2012, ch. 853, § 4; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-109 concerned judicial vacancies, public meeting of commission, notice, interviews with candidates, additional meetings, voting, and certification of nominees.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-110 concerned qualifications of judicial nominees.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-111 concerned members of commission ineligibility for judicial nominations.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-112 concerned judicial appointments from nominees from commission and expiration of terms.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-4-113 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, § 13; T.C.A., § 17-713; Acts 1986, ch. 624, § 5; 1994, ch. 942, § 15), concerning appointment when commission fails to nominate, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 942, § 15, effective September 1, 1994, except for the purposes of making appointments to the judicial evaluation and selection commissions, authorizing the supreme court to establish the rule regarding judicial evaluation, and electing appellate court judges in the 1994 regular August election, for which purposes it took effect May 9, 1994.

Former §17-4-113 concerned appointments by governor if commission does not furnish list of nominees and expiration of terms.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-114 concerned declaration of candidacy to fill unexpired term, election, ballot, and declaration of candidacy not timely filed.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-115 concerned declaration of candidacy for reelection for full term, time of filing, exception, form of ballot, rejection of candidate, appointment.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-116 concerned failure to seek reelection, nomination and appointment subject to election, exception, rejection of candidate, and appointment.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-117. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-117 concerned duties of administrative office of the courts.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.